chamalal.noun.lexd
LEXICON NomPlForm
а[3]:аавбе
а2з[4]:а2забе
а2з[5]:а2збе
а2зхоша[5]:а2зхошбе
а2кв[3]:а2квабе
а2квал[5]:а2квалди
а2лълъа[4]:а2лълъвбе
а2цв[3]:а2цвбе
аа[5]:аабе
абул[5]:абулди
ади[4]:адбе
азбар[3]:азбарди
акьв[5]:акьвабе
алаха[3]:алахбе
ам[3]:амбе 
ам[3]:аме
амах[3]:амахи
анна[4]:аннабе
анна[4]:аннбе
апал[5]:апалди
ас[3]:асбе
атв[5]:атвабе
ах[4]:ахбе
ахва[3]:ахвбе
аххим[4]:аххимди
аххим[4]:аххме
ачиргъа2[3]:къачиргъаме
баай[3]:баайбе
бааха2[4]:баахаме
багьа[3]:багьбе
базар[3]:базарди
байда2[3]:байдаме
бакь[3]:бакье
бала[3]:балабе
бала[3]:балабе
бала[3]:балбе
бала[3]:балбе
балъа[3]:балъе
барт[3]:бартбе
бата[4]:батбе
батӏа[3]:батӏабе
бахь[3]:бахьбе
бац[3]:бацбе
бацӏа[3]:бацӏе
бачӏв[3]:бачӏвабе
бегьа2[3]:бегьаме
безу2[3]:безвме
бекъулӏ[5]:бекъулӏбе
бекь[3]:бекьабе
бекьв[5]:бекьвабе
бекӏвана[3]:бекӏванбе
бекӏу2[3]:бекIвме
бел[4]:белди
белу2[3]:белу2ди
берекв[3]:береквбе
бесу2[3]:бесвме
бецв[3]:бецвабе
беча[4]:бече
бечӏи2[4]:бечIме
бийаца[4]:бийацвбе
била[3]:билбе
бисӏсӏ[3]:бисӏсӏбе
бисӏсӏа[3]:бисӏсӏабе
биц[3]:бицбе
биъи2лъи[4]:биъи2лъбе
босӏсӏ[3]:босӏсӏабе
босӏсӏ[4]:босӏсӏабе
боту2[3]:ботме
боч[3]:бочабе
боша[3]:бошбе
бошу2-чӏикъ[4]:бошу2-чӏикъбе
бугь[3]:бугьбе
бул[3]:булабе
бутухх[3]:бутуххбе
буцур[3]:буцурди
бээл[5]:бээлди
вагьа[1]:вагье
вара2[3]:вараме
вац[1]:вацбе
вацааб[1]:вацаабе
вогьа[4]:вогьбе
вогьа[4]:вогьбе
воху2-ссапа[4]:воху2-ссапабе
воху2[4]:вохме
вукь[4]:вукьабе
галъв[5]:галъвабе
гама[3]:гамбе
ганнв[3]:ганнвабе
гарашв[5]:гарашвбе
гачӏа[3]:гачӏбе
гва2гва[3]:гва2гвабе
гва2гва[3]:гва2гвбе
гегв[3]:гегвбе
гезма[3]:гезмбе
гел[3]:геле
гору2[5]:горме
гошеема[1]:гошеембе
гургу2[3]:гургме
гъа2цӏа[3]:гъа2цӏабе
гъа2цӏа[3]:гъа2цӏе
гъаай[5]:гъаайбе
гъаб[3]:гъабе
гъабучӏ[3]:гъабачӏи
гъагъа[3]:гъагъе
гъада[4]:гъадабе
гъадачӏа[3]:гъадачӏвбе
гъазв[3]:гъазвабе
гъалее[3]:гъалеебе
гъамасса[3]:гъамассвбе
гъварв[5]:гъварабе
гъее[4]:гъеебе
гъеев[3]:гъеевбе
гъилв[5]:гъилвабе
гъогъв[3]:гъогъвбе
гъогъма[4]:гъогъмбе
гъод[5]:гъодбе
гъоц[3]:гъоцбе
гъоцӏун[3]:гъоцӏме
гъу2гъ[3]:гъу2гъе
гъун[5]:гъунабе
гъуу2[3]:гъуне
гьа2къв[3]:гьа2къвабэ
гьа2къваза[3]:гьа2къвазвбе
гьа2кӏв[5]:гьа2кӏвабе
гьа2кӏва[3]:гьа2кӏвбе
гьаа2[1]:гьаа2бе
гьаа2[3]:гьаа2бе
гьаб[5]:гьабе
гьадам[1]:гьадаме
гьакьа[4]:гьакьабе
гьакьв[3]:гьакьвабе
гьакьв[5]:гьакьвабе
гьала[4]:гьалбе
гьалв[5]:гьалвабе
гьаниха[3]:гьанихвбе
гьаннир[5]:гьаннирди
гьанчӏе[4]:гьанчӏбе
гьасӏа[3]:гьасӏабе
гьасӏа[3]:гьасӏабе
гьасӏсӏ[2]:гьакIвбе
гьасӏсӏ[2]:гьасӏсӏе
гьасӏсӏим[3]:гьасӏсӏиме
гьачӏа[3]:гьачӏе
гьекьим[3]:гьекьме
гьекӏв[5]:гьекӏвабе
гьекӏва[1]:гьекӏвабе
гьи2гьв[3]:гьи2гьве
гьи2сӏсӏв[5]:гьи2сӏсӏвабе
гьи2сӏсӏв[5]:гьи2сӏсӏвбе
гьи2цӏакъв[4]:гьи2цӏакъвбе
гьи2цIа[4]:гьи2цIбе
гьигьва2[3]:гьигьваме
гьилв[5]:гьилвбе
гьим[5]:гьимабе
гьим[5]:гьиме
гьоб[5]:гьобе
гьодул[5]:гьодулди
гьок[3]:гьокабе
гьу2сӏсӏ[4]:гьу2сӏсIбе
гьу2чӏа[3]:гьу2чӏбе
гьу2чӏа[4]:гьу2чӏабе
гьума[3]:гьуме
гьуу2[4]:гьуу2бе
даа2[3]:дааме
даа2[4]:къаай
даа2[4]:къаайбе
джаайлӏв[5]:джаайлӏвбе
джаджа[3]:джаджбе
джанавар[3]:джанаварди
джанв[5]:джанвабе
джарв[5]:джарвабе
джиджи2[4]:джиджме
додра[3]:додрбе
доо[3]:дообе
жуж[3]:жуже
жула[4]:жулбе
заа[3]:заабе
заза[5]:зазбе
зва2зваракӏв[5]:зва2зваракӏвбе
зее[3]:зеебе
зин[3]:зине
зихъ[4]:зихъбе
и2гьв[5]:и2гьвабе
и2гьва[3]:и2гьви
и2лъа[3]:и2лъабе
и2са[5]:и2сабе
и2ха[3]:и2хи
и2цв[3]:и2цвабе
игьир[3]:игьирди
избула[3]:избулди
ии2[3]:ии2бе
икве2[4]:икваме
ила[2]:илвбе
илакьар[2]:илакьарбе
има[1]:имбе
имакьар[1]:имакьарбе
инахв[3]:инахвбе
инибикьиннаб[3]:инийакьиннабе
иниссиналӏв[4]:иниссиналӏвбе
инна[4]:иннбе
иса[3]:исбе
иша[3]:ише
йагь[2]:йагьи
йакьил[4]:йакьбе
йакӏва[4]:йакӏвбе
йац[2]:йацбе
йацааб[2]:йацаабе
йацӏум[4]:йацӏвме
йачал[4]:йачалди
йегъил[4]:йегъабе
йегъил[4]:йегъилди
йегьи2[4]:йегьме
йекьв[5]:йекьвабе
йела-квии2[3]:йела-квиинне
йела[4]:йелбе
йелалӏ[4]:йелалӏвбе
йелъа[4]:йелъбе
йелъаб[3]:йелъабе
йергъва2[4]:йергъваме
йетӏана[3]:йетӏани
йехъи2[4]:йехъме
йикь[4]:йикьбе
йикӏкӏв[4]:йикӏкӏвбе
йикӏул[4]:йикӏулди
йичӏа[3]:йичӏабе
йэкъмукъ[3]:йэкъмукъбэ
йэсӏсӏа[4]:йэсӏсӏбе
каав[3]:каавбе
кагъат[3]:кагъатвбе
калам[3]:каламали
ква2квал[3]:ква2квали
ква2сса[3]:ква2ссабе
кваа2-цӏаа[4]:кваа2-цӏаабе
квагь[4]:квагьбе
квакъи2[4]:квакъме
кварв[3]:кварвабе
кваха[4]:квахи
кваша[3]:квашбе
квекьа[4]:квекьбе
квел[4]:квелабе
квии2[3]:квинне
кечӏ[3]:кечӏабе
кира[3]:кирбе
киса[3]:кисбе
коба[3]:кобабе
коба[4]:кобабе
кор[3]:корбе
котӏа[4]:котӏбе
котӏа[4]:котӏбе
кочул[5]:кочулди
кулпат[3]:кулпатбе
кума[3]:кумбе
кусс[3]:куссбе
кучул[5]:кучулди
къама[3]:къаме
къаратӏв[5]:къаратӏвбе
къаркъала[3]:къаркъалабе
къатв[5]:къатвабе
къва2къва-цора[3]:къва2къва-цорбе
къва2къва[3]:къва2къвбе
къваагъа2[3]:къваагъаме
къваайкьв[5]:къваайкьвбе
къинв[5]:къинвбе
къиша[3]:къишбе
къишв[5]:къишвабе
къоб[3]:къобабе
къогь[3]:къогьабе
къу2къ[5]:къу2къе
къула[3]:къулбе
къунна[4]:къуннбе
кьа2чӏа[3]:кьа2чӏбе
кьа2чӏал[3]:кьа2чӏалди
кьебул[5]:кьебулди
кьее[4]:кьеебе
кьее[5]:кьеебе
кьее[5]:кьеебе
кьежа2[3]:кьежаме
кьессал[3]:кьессалди
кьиби[3]:кьибди
кьикьил[4]:кьикьилди
кьили[3]:кьиле
кьод[5]:кьоде
кӏа2з[4]:кӏа2збе
кӏарт[3]:кӏартбе
кӏач[5]:кӏачбе
кӏва2кьа[3]:кӏва2кьабе
кӏва2кӏварацв[5]:кӏва2кӏварацвбе
кӏваб[5]:кӏвабе
кӏиликӏа[3]:кӏиликӏвбе
кӏобара[3]:кӏобарди
кӏукӏу2[3]:кӏукӏме
кӏуу2[3]:кӏуме
ла2пушка[3]:ла2пушкабе
лага[3]:лагабе
лачи2[1]:лачме
лъаква[3]:лъаквбе
лъал-гьанкӏва[3]:лъал-гьанкӏвбе
лъал[3]:лъалабе
лъам[3]:лъамди
лъам[3]:лъаме
лъасӏсӏв[5]:лъасӏсӏвабе
лъегъи2[4]:лъегьме
лъеди[3]:лъеде
лъецӏил[3]:лъецӏбе
лъи2варалӏв[5]:лъи2варалӏвбе
лълъии2[4]:лълъии2бе
лъум[5]:лъумбе
лъум[5]:лъуме
лъунни[3]:лъунне
лээ[3]:лээбэ
лӏилӏ[4]:лӏилӏабе
маа[5]:маабе
маай[3]:маайбе
маала[4]:маалвбе
магъал[3]:магъалди
магь[3]:магьбе
маза[3]:мазбе
макьв[5]:макьвабе
макӏа[3]:макӏабе
макӏва[3]:макӏвбе
мамаша[3]:мамашвбе
мачӏ[1]:мачӏи
мачӏ[2]:мачӏи
мачӏ[3]:мачӏи
маш[3]:машбе
мигъа[4]:мигъбе
мигьа[3]:мигьбе
мизатӏв[5]:мизатӏвбе
мийахъв[3]:мийахъвбе
микъ[3]:микъабе
микӏссил[5]:микӏссилди
милъ[3]:милъабе
минна[3]:миннбе
мисӏсӏ[3]:мисӏсӏбе
митӏв[5]:митӏвабе
мичӏа[3]:мичӏбе
мугура[3]:мугурди
мугъул[3]:мугъулди
мукьул[3]:мукьулди
муса[3]:мусе
мусур[3]:мусурди
муха[3]:мухабе
муш[3]:мушбе
наква[5]:наквабе
налъ[4]:налъбе
насӏсӏ[3]:насӏсӏе
никв[3]:никве
никвал[5]:никвабе
никвал[5]:никвалди
нисалӏ[3]:нисалӏвбе
ниха[3]:нихабе
нича[3]:ничбе
ниша[3]:нишабе
ниша[3]:нишбе
нур[3]:нурбе
нусийа[3]:нусийбе
орба[3]:орбе
ордек[3]:ордекбе
орхъи[4]:орхъибе
отул[5]:отулди
ош[4]:ошбе
паласс[3]:палассбе
папал[3]:папалди
пасса2[3]:пассаме
пепа-квии2[3]:пепа-квине
пийа2[3]:пийаме
пул[3]:пуле
рагъ[3]:рагъбе
рачч[3]:раччбе
реки2[4]:рекме
саа[3]:сади
салв[5]:сале
сарв[3]:сарвабе
сегьи2[3]:сегьме
секӏв[3]:секӏвабе
синалӏв[5]:синалӏвбе
ссагӏат[3]:ссагӏатбе
ссалажа[3]:ссалажбе
ссапи2[3]:ссапме
ссее[3]:ссеебе
ссии2в[5]:ссии2вбе
ссирв[3]:ссирвабе
ссу2ча[4]:ссу2чабе
ссу2ча[4]:ссу2чбе
ссу2чӏа[4]:ссу2чӏбе
ссур[3]:ссурбе
сусукӏ[5]:сусукӏбе
сӏсӏаа[3]:сӏсӏаале
сӏсӏаа[4]:сӏсӏаабе
сӏсӏан[4]:сӏсӏанбе
сӏсӏатӏа2[4]:сӏсӏатӏаме
сӏсӏедв[5]:сӏсӏедвбе
сӏсӏее[3]:сӏсӏеле
сӏсӏее[4]:сӏсӏеебе
сӏсӏера2тӏв[5]:сӏсӏера2тӏвбе
сӏсӏет[4]:сӏсӏетбе
сӏсӏехъва[3]:сӏсӏехъвбе
сӏсӏечӏи[3]:сӏсӏечӏе
сӏсӏиква2[5]:сӏсӏикваме
сӏсӏикъва[4]:сӏсӏикъве
сӏсӏиналӏ[3]:сӏсӏине
сӏсӏиналӏв[3]:сӏсӏине
сӏсӏуу2[5]:сӏсӏуу2бе
таай[5]:таайбе
тавхан[3]:тавхаме
тагума[5]:тагумабе
тан[3]:танбе
тарашв[3]:тарашвбе
тарпа[3]:тарпбе
тассв[5]:тассве
тисӏсӏв[3]:тисӏсӏвабе
тисӏсӏкӏул[3]:тисӏсӏкӏулди
туб[5]:тубе
тускур[3]:тускурди
тусснахъ[3]:тусснахъбе
тӏамсса[3]:тӏамссабе
тӏана[3]:тӏане
тӏу2тӏ[3]:тӏу2тӏе
у2сс[4]:у2ссбе
у2сс[4]:у2ссбе
ун[4]:унабе
ун[5]:унбе
урдек[3]:урдекбе
устур[4]:устурди
хваай[3]:хваде
хвам[5]:хваме
хими[4]:химди
хими[4]:химиди
хоха[3]:хохабе
хоха[3]:хохбе
хоша[4]:хошбе
хул[5]:хулабе
хусси[4]:хусди
ххи2та[4]:ххи2тбе
ххи2трум[5]:ххи2труме
ххи2чӏбакъв[4]:ххи2чӏбакъвбе
ххинчӏ[3]:ххинчӏбе
ххоххатур[3]:ххоххатурди
хъа2та[3]:хъа2тбе
хъа2ч[3]:хъа2чбе
хъабача[5]:хъабачвбе
хъаз[3]:хъазбе
хъал[3]:хъалабе
хъала[3]:хъалбе
хъарцигъа[3]:хъарцигъбе
хъиза2[3]:хъизаме
хъод[5]:хъодбе
хӏужрукъ[5]:хӏужрукъбе
циб[5]:цибе
цибакь[3]:цибакьбе
цухари[3]:цухарибе
цӏаа[4]:цӏаабе
цӏаддура[3]:цӏаддурбе
цӏи2ву[4]:цӏи2вбе
цӏулли[3]:цӏулди
чаа[4]:чаабе
чаг[3]:чагбе
чад[4]:чадбе
чакар[3]:чакарди
чаквмаал[3]:чаквмаали
чанагъа[3]:чанагъвбе
чархъ[3]:чархъали
чархъи2[4]:чархъме
чача[3]:чаче
черх[3]:черхбе
чесса[3]:чессбе
чиба[3]:чиби
чила[4]:чилвбе
чирахъ[3]:чирахъвбе
чочра[3]:чочрбе
чӏаав[5]:чӏаавбе
чӏавар[5]:чӏаварди
чӏам[3]:чӏаме
чӏанн[3]:чӏанне
чӏатв[3]:чӏатве
чӏаххвма[3]:чӏаххвмабе
чӏачӏа2[5]:чӏачӏаме
чӏекӏва[3]:чӏекӏвабе
чӏелв[5]:чӏелвабе
чӏетв[5]:чӏетвабе
чӏи2кӏв[3]:чӏи2кӏве
чӏива[4]:чӏивбе
чӏисс[3]:чӏисси
чӏор[3]:чӏоре
чӏута[3]:чӏуте
эдаб[4]:эдабе
элмисӏсӏ[4]:элмисӏсӏбе
элмисӏсӏ[4]:элмисӏсӏбе
элмитӏв[3]:элмитӏвбе
элълъим[5]:элълъме
эсиб[3]:эсбе
эсибзала[4]:эсибзале
эсӏсӏ[5]:эсӏсӏбе
эхунлъи[4]:эхунлъбе
эш[3]:эши
эъа[3]:эъабе
ээ[3]:ээбе
